Washington statutes.
RCW 32.32.405

Application—Certain named persons—Filing of written consent required.

(1) If any accountant, attorney, investment banker, appraiser, or other persons whose professions give authority to a statement made in any application under this chapter is named as having prepared, reviewed, passed upon, or certified any part thereof, or any report or valuation for use in connection therewith, the written consent of the person shall be filed with the application. If any portion of a report of an expert is quoted or summarized as such in any filing under this chapter, the written consent of the expert shall expressly state that the expert consents to this quotation or summarization.

(2) All written consents filed pursuant to this section shall be dated and signed manually. A list of the consents shall be filed with the application. Where the consent of the expert is contained in the expert's report, a reference shall be made in the list to the report containing the consent.

[ 1981 c 85 s 80.]